Nebraska, session 109, LB736.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
Section 1. The State of Nebraska adopts the Athletic Trainer
Compact in the form substantially as follows:
SECTION 1. TITLE AND PURPOSE
This statute shall be known and cited as the Athletic Trainer
Compact. The purposes of this compact are to expand mobility of Athletic
Training practice and improve public access to services by providing
qualified Licensed Athletic Trainers the ability to practice in other
Member States. This compact preserves the regulatory authority of States
to protect public health and safety through the current system of State
licensure.
This compact is designed to achieve the following objectives:
A. Increase public access to Athletic Training and enhance
continuity of care by providing for the mutual recognition of other
Licenses issued by Member States;
B. Provide an additional streamlined opportunity for interstate
practice by Licensed Athletic Trainers who meet compact uniform
requirements;
C. Promote mobility and workforce development by eliminating the
necessity for Licenses in multiple States by providing for the mutual
recognition of other Licenses issued by Member States;
D. Reduce administrative burdens on Licensed Athletic Trainers and
Member States;
E. Enhance the States' ability to protect the public's health and
safety;
F. Encourage the cooperation of Member States in regulating
interstate practice of Licensed Athletic Trainers;
G. Support relocating Active Military Members and their spouses;
H. Enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and
disciplinary information among Member States;
I. Allow for the use of telehealth to facilitate increased access to
Athletic Training services;
-2-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
J. Support the uniformity of Licensed Athletic Trainer licensure
requirements throughout the States;
K. Affirm the authority of all Member States to hold a Licensed
Athletic Trainer accountable for abiding by the Scope of Practice in the
State in which the patient is located at the time of care; and
L. Require adherence to the Model Compact Language in order to
promote uniformity and ensure that all Member States have accepted and
are mutually obligated to the same terms.
SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS
As used in this compact, unless the context requires otherwise, the
following definitions shall apply:
A. "Active Military Member" means any individual with full-time duty
status in the active armed forces of the United States, including members
of the National Guard and Reserve;
B. "Adverse Action" means any administrative, civil, equitable, or
criminal action permitted by a State's laws which is imposed by a
Licensing Authority or other authority against a Licensee, including
actions against an individual's License or Compact Privilege such as
revocation, suspension, probation, monitoring of the Licensee, limitation
on the Licensee's practice, or any other Encumbrance on licensure
affecting a Licensee's authorization to practice;
C. "Alternative Program" means a nondisciplinary monitoring or
practice remediation process applicable to an Athletic Trainer approved
by a State Licensing Authority of a Member State in which the Athletic
Trainer is licensed. This includes, but is not limited to, programs to
which Licensees with substance use, addiction, or mental health
conditions are referred in lieu of Adverse Action;
D. "Athletic Training" means the prevention, examination,
assessment, treatment, and rehabilitation of emergent, acute, or chronic
injuries and medical conditions as defined by applicable Member State
laws and regulations;
-3-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
E. "Athletic Trainer Compact Commission" or "Compact Commission"
means the government agency whose membership consists of all States that
have enacted this compact, as described herein and which shall operate as
an instrumentality of the Member States to administer and implement the
compact according to its terms;
F. "BOC" means the Board of Certification, Inc. or any successor
organization thereto;
G. "CAATE" means the Commission on Accreditation of Athletic
Training Education or any successor organization thereto;
H. "Charter Member State" means any Member State which enacted and
made effective this compact by law before the compact effective date
specified herein;
I. "Commissioner" means the individual appointed by a Member State
to serve as the member of the Commission for that Member State;
J. "Compact Privilege" means the legal authorization granted by a
Remote State, equivalent to a License, allowing a Licensee from another
Member State to provide Athletic Training services in a Remote State;
K. "Compact Qualifying License" means a License that is not an
Encumbered License issued by a Member State to practice Athletic Training
which qualifies the Licensee to exercise a Compact Privilege pursuant to
Section 4 of this compact;
L. "Continuing Competence" means a requirement, as a condition of
License renewal, to provide evidence of successful participation, and
completion of, educational and professional activities relevant to
practice or area of work. For purposes of this compact, evidence of
active BOC certification may satisfy the meaning of Continuing Competence
as set forth herein;
M. "Current Significant Investigative Information" means the
existence of:
1. Investigative Information that a Licensing Authority, after a
preliminary inquiry that includes notification and an opportunity for the
-4-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
subject Licensee to respond, if required by State law, has reason to
believe is not groundless and, if proven true, would indicate more than a
minor infraction; or
2. Investigative Information that indicates that the subject
Licensee represents an immediate threat to public health and safety
regardless of whether the subject Licensee has been notified and had an
opportunity to respond;
N. "Criminal Background Check" means the submission of fingerprints
or other biometric-based information for a License applicant for the
purpose of obtaining that applicant's criminal history record
information, as defined in 28 C.F.R. 20.3(d) from the Federal Bureau of
Investigation and the State's criminal history record repository as
defined in 28 C.F.R. 20.3(f);
O. "Data System" means the Commission's repository of information
about Licensees, including, but not limited to, examination, licensure,
investigative, Compact Privilege, Adverse Action, and Alternative
Program;
P. "Encumbrance" or "Encumbered" means a revocation or suspension
of, or any limitation or condition on, the full and unrestricted practice
of Athletic Training;
Q. "Executive Committee" means a group of Commissioners elected or
appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by,
the compact and Commission;
R. "Investigative Information" means information, records, and
documents received or generated by a Licensing Authority pursuant to an
investigation;
S. "Jurisprudence Requirement" means the assessment of an
individual's knowledge of the laws and Rules governing the practice of
Athletic Training, as applicable, in a State;
T. "License" means current authorization by a Member State to engage
in the practice of Athletic Training;
-5-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
U. "Licensee" or "Licensed Athletic Trainer" means an individual who
currently holds an active, unrestricted License and who meets all of the
requirements outlined in Section 4 of this compact;
V. "Licensing Authority" means the board or agency of a State, or
equivalent, that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of
Athletic Trainers;
W. "Model Compact Language" means the model language for the
Athletic Trainer Compact on file with The Council of State Governments or
other entity as designated by the Commission to which all Member States
must substantively adhere and adopt;
X. "Member State" means a State that has enacted the compact;
Y. "Remote State" means a Member State other than the State of
Qualifying Licensure;
Z. "Rule" means a regulation promulgated by an authorized entity
that has the force of law;
AA. "Scope of Practice" means the procedures, actions, and processes
an Athletic Trainer licensed in a State is permitted to undertake in that
State and the circumstances under which the Licensee is permitted to
undertake those procedures, actions, and processes. Such procedures,
actions, and processes and the circumstances under which they may be
undertaken may be established through means, including, but not limited
to, statute, regulations, case law, and other processes available to the
State Licensing Authority or other government agency. Scope of Practice
shall include any State requirements regarding supervision or direction,
if required by such State and as further defined by such State's statutes
and regulations;
BB. "Single-State License" means a License issued by any State that
authorizes practice only within the issuing State;
CC. "State" means any state, commonwealth, district, or territory of
the United States of America;
DD. "State of Qualifying Licensure" means the Member State that has
-6-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
issued a Compact Qualifying License to a Licensee pursuant to this
compact; and
EE. "Unencumbered License" means a License that authorizes a
Licensee to engage in the full and unrestricted practice of Athletic
Training.
SECTION 3. STATE PARTICIPATION IN THE COMPACT
A. To be eligible to join this compact and to maintain eligibility
as a Member State, a State must:
1. Enact and maintain a statute that is not materially different
from the Model Compact Language;
2. License and regulate the practice of Athletic Training;
3. Require that Licensees in that State maintain Continuing
Competence standards as part of their State practice act or Rules;
4. Have a mechanism in place for receiving and investigating
complaints about Licensees;
5. Grant the Compact Privilege to a Licensee who meets all the
requirements outlined in Section 4 of this compact in accordance with the
terms of the compact and any Rules promulgated thereunder;
6. Participate fully in the Compact Commission's Data System,
including using the unique identifier as defined in Rules;
7. Notify the Compact Commission, in compliance with the terms of
the compact and Rules, of any Adverse Action or the availability of
Current Significant Investigative Information regarding a Licensee;
8. Within a time frame established by Rule, implement or utilize
procedures for considering the criminal history records of applicants for
a Compact Qualifying License which includes receiving the results of the
Federal Bureau of Investigation record search and shall use those results
in making licensure decisions. These procedures shall include the
submission of fingerprints or other biometric-based information by
applicants for the purpose of obtaining an applicant's criminal history
record information from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the
-7-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
agency responsible for retaining that State's criminal records;
a. A Member State must fully implement a Criminal Background Check
requirement in order to participate in the issuance and acceptance of
Compact Privileges; and
b. Communication between a Member State and the Compact Commission
or among Member States regarding the verification of eligibility for
licensure through the compact shall not include any information received
from the Federal Bureau of Investigation relating to a federal criminal
records check performed by a Member State; and
9. Comply with and enforce the Rules of the Compact Commission.
B. Member States may set and collect a fee for issuance and renewal
of a Compact Privilege to applicants.
C. Individuals without a Compact Qualifying License shall continue
to be able to apply for a Member State's Single-State License as provided
under the laws of each Member State.
D. Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established
by a Member State for the issuance of a Single-State License.
E. A Compact Qualifying License shall be recognized by each Remote
State as authorizing that Licensee to engage in the practice of Athletic
Training, under a Compact Privilege, in another Member State in
accordance with the requirements in Section 4 of this compact.
SECTION 4. COMPACT PRIVILEGE
A. To be eligible for a Compact Privilege under the terms and
provisions of the compact, the Licensee shall complete a Criminal
Background Check performed by the Licensing Authority in the State of
Qualifying Licensure prior to entry in the compact and shall:
1. Satisfy one of the following two pathways:
a. Hold a valid current active certification through the BOC, or its
successor organization; or
b. If a Licensee does not meet the requirements of subsection
4.A.1.a., the following must be completed:
-8-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
i. An education program which is one of the following:
1. At least a bachelor's degree with a major course of study in
Athletic Training, or an equivalent course of study from a college or
university accredited at the time of graduation by CAATE, or its
successor organization;
2. An academic degree from a college or university in a foreign
country equivalent to the degree described in subparagraph 1 of this
subsection with a major course of study as described in subparagraph 1 of
this subsection that is accredited by CAATE, or its successor
organization; or
3. The substantial equivalent of the foregoing which the Commission
may determine by Rule; and
ii. Successful completion of the exam administered by the BOC, or
its successor organization, preceding the date of the Licensee's
application for licensure in their State of Qualifying Licensure or the
substantial equivalent of the foregoing requirement which the Commission
may determine by Rule.
2. Hold a Compact Qualifying License;
3. Have not had any Encumbrance against any License or Compact
Privilege to practice Athletic Training within the previous two years;
4. Be eligible for a Compact Privilege in any Member State in
accordance with Section 4 of this compact;
5. Notify the Compact Commission that the Licensee is seeking the
Compact Privilege within a Remote State;
6. Pay any applicable fees, including any State fee, for the Compact
Privilege;
7. Meet only the Continuing Competence requirements established by
the State of Qualifying Licensure;
8. Comply with any requirements of the State of Qualifying Licensure
as set forth in Section 3 of this compact;
9. Meet any Jurisprudence Requirements established by the Remote
-9-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
State in which the Licensee is seeking a Compact Privilege; and
10. Report to the Compact Commission any Adverse Action,
Encumbrance, or restriction on a License taken by any non-Member State
within thirty days from the date the action is taken.
B. The Compact Privilege is valid until the expiration date of the
Compact Qualifying License. To maintain a Compact Privilege, renewal of
the Compact Privilege shall be congruent with the renewal of the Compact
Qualifying License as the Compact Commission may define by Rule. The
Licensee must comply with the requirements of this section to maintain
the Compact Privilege in the Remote State. A Licensee may apply for and
hold Compact Privileges in multiple Member States.
C. A Licensed Athletic Trainer must follow the Scope of Practice of
the Member State where the patient is located. A Licensee engaging in the
practice of Athletic Training in a Remote State under the Compact
Privilege shall adhere to the Scope of Practice laws and regulations of
the Remote State. Licensees shall be responsible for educating themselves
on, and complying with, any and all Scope of Practice laws and
regulations and State laws relating to the remote practice of Athletic
Training, as applicable.
D. A Licensee engaging in the practice of Athletic Training in a
Remote State is subject to that State's regulatory authority. A Remote
State may, in accordance with due process and that State's laws, remove a
Licensee's Compact Privilege in the Remote State for a specific period of
time, impose fines, or take any other necessary actions to protect the
health and safety of its citizens. Any Member State which undertakes such
an action shall promptly notify the Member State and the Commission as
specified in the Rules. The Licensee may be deemed to be ineligible to
exercise the Compact Privilege by any Member State until the specific
time for removal has passed and all fines are paid.
E. All Member State disciplinary orders that impose Adverse Action
against a Compact Qualifying License shall result in deactivation of the
-10-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
Licensee's Compact Privilege in all Member States during the pendency of
the order. If a Compact Qualifying License is Encumbered, the Licensee
shall lose the Compact Privilege in any Remote State until the following
occur:
1. The Compact Qualifying License is no longer Encumbered; and
2. The Licensee has not had any Encumbrance or restriction against
any License, Compact Qualifying License, or Compact Privilege within the
previous two years.
F. Once an Encumbered License is restored to good standing as a
Compact Qualifying License (as certified by the Licensing Authority) the
Licensee must meet the requirements of this section to obtain a Compact
Privilege in any Remote State.
G. If a Licensee's Compact Privilege in any Remote State is removed,
that Licensee may also lose the Compact Privilege in other Remote States,
as each Member State shall determine in its sole authority, until the
following occur:
1. The specific period of time for which the Compact Privilege was
removed has ended;
2. All fines have been paid; and
3. Have not had any Encumbrance or restriction against any License
or Compact Privilege within the previous two years.
H. Once the requirements of Section 4.G have been met, the Licensee
must meet the requirements in Section 4.A to obtain a Compact Privilege
in a Remote State.
SECTION 5. COMPACT QUALIFYING LICENSE
A. A Licensee may only designate one License as their Compact
Qualifying License at a time. The procedures for such designation may be
further defined by Compact Commission Rule.
B. Nothing in this Section shall require that the State of
Qualifying Licensure be the State of primary residence or State of
primary practice for the Licensee.
-11-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
C. Nothing in this compact shall interfere with a Licensee's ability
to hold a Single-State License in multiple States.
D. Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established
by a Member State for the issuance of a Single-State License.
SECTION 6. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER OR THEIR SPOUSES
An Active Military Member or their spouse shall not be required to
pay a fee to the Commission for a Compact Privilege. If a Member State
chooses to charge a Member State fee, it may choose to charge a reduced
fee or no fee to an Active Military Member or their spouse for a Compact
Privilege.
SECTION 7. ADVERSE ACTIONS
A. A Member State in which a Licensee is issued a Compact Qualifying
License shall have the exclusive authority to impose Adverse Action
against the Compact Qualifying License issued by that Member State.
B. A Member State may take Adverse Action based on Current
Significant Investigative Information of a Remote State, so long as the
Member State follows its own procedures for imposing Adverse Action.
C. Nothing in this compact shall override a Member State's decision
that participation in an Alternative Program may be used in lieu of
Adverse Action and that such participation shall remain non-public if
required by the Member State's laws or Rules.
D. A Remote State shall have the authority to:
1. Take Adverse Actions as set forth herein against a Licensee's
Compact Privilege in that State; and
2. Issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require
the attendance and testimony of witnesses as well as the production of
evidence.
a. Subpoenas may be issued by a Member State Athletic Training
Licensing Authority for the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the
production of evidence.
b. A Member State which issues a subpoena may request service of
-12-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
that subpoena by another Member State. The Member State receiving the
request to serve a subpoena shall serve the subpoena if it is deemed
enforceable by a court of competent jurisdiction according to the
practice and procedure in the receiving Member State.
c. The issuing authority shall pay any witness fees, travel
expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service statutes of the
State where the witnesses or evidence are located.
E. For purposes of taking Adverse Action, a Member State shall give
the same priority and effect to reported conduct received from another
Member State as it would if the conduct had occurred within that State.
In so doing, the investigating Member State shall apply its own State
laws to determine appropriate action.
F. A Member State, if otherwise permitted by State law, may recover
from the affected Licensee the costs of investigations and dispositions
of cases resulting from any Adverse Action taken against that Licensee.
G. Joint Investigations:
1. In addition to the authority granted to a Member State by its
respective State law, any Member State may participate with other Member
States in joint investigations of Licensees.
2. Member States shall share any Current Significant Investigative
Information, litigation, or compliance materials in furtherance of any
joint or individual investigation initiated under the compact. In sharing
such information between Member State Athletic Trainer Licensing
Authorities, all information obtained shall be kept confidential, except
as otherwise mutually agreed upon by the sharing and receiving Member
States.
3. A Remote State may issue subpoenas on behalf of a Member State
for both hearings and investigations that require the attendance and
testimony of witnesses as well as the production of evidence.
H. If a Member State takes Adverse Action, it shall promptly notify
the administrator of the Data System. The administrator of the Data
-13-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
System shall promptly notify all Member States of any Adverse Actions by
Remote States.
I. Nothing in this compact may permit a Member State to take any
Adverse Action against a Licensee or holder of a Compact Privilege for
conduct or practice occurring in another Member State that was legal in
the Member State at the time it was undertaken.
SECTION 8. ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF THE COMMISSION
A. The compact Member States hereby create and establish a joint
government agency whose membership consists of all Member States that
have enacted the compact known as the Athletic Trainer Licensure Compact
Commission. The Compact Commission is an instrumentality of the Member
States acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one State. The
Compact Commission shall come into existence on or after the effective
date of the compact as set forth in Section 12 of this compact.
B. Membership, Voting, and Meetings
1. Each Member State shall have and be limited to one Commissioner
selected by that Member State's Licensing Authority within sixty days of
the Member State's effective date.
2. The Commissioner shall be an administrator or their designated
staff or current board member of the Licensing Authority.
3. The Compact Commission may recommend removal or suspension of any
Commissioner from office.
4. A Member State's Licensing Authority shall fill any vacancy of
its Commissioner occurring on the Compact Commission within sixty days of
the vacancy.
5. Each Commissioner shall be entitled to one vote on all matters
before the Compact Commission requiring a vote by the Commissioners.
6. The Compact Commission shall meet at least once during each
calendar year. Additional meetings may be held as set forth in the
Commission bylaws. A Commissioner shall vote in person or by such other
means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for Commissioners
-14-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
to meet by telecommunication, videoconference, or other means of
communication.
C. The Compact Commission shall have the following powers:
1. Promulgate, adopt, and amend Rules and bylaws;
2. Establish code of conduct, confidentiality, and conflict of
interest policies for Commissioners;
3. Establish the fiscal year of the Compact Commission;
4. Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
5. Purchase and maintain insurance and insurance bonds;
6. Accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not
limited to, employees of a Member State;
7. Conduct a financial review or audit;
8. Hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation,
define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out
the purposes of the compact, and establish the Compact Commission's
personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest,
qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters;
9. Enter into contracts or arrangements for the management of the
affairs of the Commission;
10. Assess and collect fees;
11. Accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of
money, other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at
all times the Compact Commission shall avoid any appearance of
impropriety or conflict of interest;
12. Lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, invest, or use any
property, real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
13. Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
14. Establish a budget and make expenditures;
15. Borrow and invest money;
-15-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
16. Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions
of this compact, the Compact Commission's Rules, and the bylaws;
17. Initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name
of the Compact Commission, provided that the standing of any Licensing
Authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
18. Maintain and certify records and information provided to a
Member State as the authenticated business records of the Compact
Commission, and designate an agent to do so on the Compact Commission's
behalf;
19. Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law
enforcement agencies;
20. Determine whether a State's adopted language is materially
different from the Model Compact Language such that the State would not
qualify for participation in the compact;
21. Establish and elect an Executive Committee, including a chair
and a vice chair, secretary, treasurer, and such other offices as the
Commission shall establish by Rule or bylaw;
22. Appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of
Member State Commissioners, State regulators, State legislators or their
representatives, and consumer representatives, and such other interested
persons as may be designated in this compact and the bylaws; and
23. Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate
to achieve the purposes of this compact.
D. The Executive Committee
1. The Executive Committee shall have the power to act on behalf of
the Compact Commission according to the terms of this compact. The
powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Executive Committee shall
include:
a. Exercise the powers and duties of the Compact Commission during
the interim between Compact Commission meetings, except for adopting or
amending Rules, adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other
-16-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
powers and duties expressly reserved to the Compact Commission by Rule or
bylaw;
b. Oversee the day-to-day activities of the administration of the
compact including enforcement and compliance with the provisions of the
compact, its Rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary;
c. Recommend to the Compact Commission changes to the Rules or
bylaws, changes to this compact legislation, fees charged to compact
Member States, fees charged to Licensees, and other fees;
d. Ensure compact administration services are appropriately
provided, including by contract;
e. Prepare and recommend the budget;
f. Maintain financial records on behalf of the Compact Commission;
g. Monitor compact compliance of Member States and provide
compliance reports to the Compact Commission;
h. Establish additional committees as necessary; and
i. Other duties as provided in the Rules or bylaws of the Compact
Commission.
2. The Executive Committee shall be composed of five voting members,
elected by the Compact Commission:
a. The chair and vice chair of the Compact Commission shall be
voting members of the Executive Committee;
b. The Compact Commission shall elect up to three additional voting
members from the current membership of the Compact Commission to include
the offices of treasurer, secretary, and one member-at-large; and
c. Up to four ex officio, nonvoting members from recognized national
athletic trainer organizations.
3. The Compact Commission may remove any member of the Executive
Committee as provided in the Compact Commission's bylaws.
4. The Executive Committee shall meet at least annually:
a. Executive Committee meetings shall be open to the public, except
that the Executive Committee may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as
-17-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
provided in this Section.
b. The Executive Committee shall give advance notice of its
meetings, posted on its website and as determined by Rule or bylaw to
provide notice to persons with an interest in the business of the Compact
Commission.
c. The Executive Committee may hold a special meeting in accordance
with this section.
E. The Compact Commission shall adopt and provide to the Member
States an annual report.
F. Meetings of the Compact Commission:
1. All meetings shall be open to the public, except that the Compact
Commission may meet in a closed, non-public meeting as provided in this
section.
2. Public notice for all meetings of the full Compact Commission
shall be given in the same manner as required under the rulemaking
provisions in this compact, except that the Compact Commission may hold a
special meeting as provided in this section.
3. The Compact Commission may hold a special meeting when it must
meet to conduct emergency business by giving twenty-four hours' notice to
all Commissioners, on the Compact Commission's website, and by other
means as provided in the Compact Commission's Rules. The Compact
Commission's legal counsel shall certify that the Compact Commission's
need to meet qualifies as an emergency.
4. The Compact Commission or the Executive Committee or other
committees of the Compact Commission may convene in a closed, non-public
meeting for the Compact Commission or Executive Committee or other
committees of the Compact Commission to receive legal advice or to
discuss:
a. Non-compliance of a Member State with its obligations under the
compact;
b. The employment, compensation, discipline, or other matters,
-18-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
practices, or procedures related to specific employees;
c. Current or threatened discipline of a Licensee by a Member
State's Licensing Authority;
d. Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
e. Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of
goods, services, or real estate;
f. Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
g. Trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is
privileged or confidential;
h. Information of a personal nature where disclosure would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
i. Investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
j. Information related to any investigative reports prepared by or
on behalf of or for use of the Compact Commission or other committee
charged with responsibility of investigation or determination of
compliance issues pursuant to the compact;
k. Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or
Member State law; or
l. Other matters as specified in Rules of the Compact Commission.
5. If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the Compact
Commission's legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting
will be closed and reference each relevant exempting provision, and such
reference shall be recorded in the minutes. All minutes and documents of
a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a
majority vote of the Compact Commission or order of a court of competent
jurisdiction.
G. Financing of the Compact Commission:
1. The Compact Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of,
the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing
activities.
2. The Compact Commission may accept any and all appropriate revenue
-19-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
sources as provided in this section.
3. The Compact Commission may levy on and collect an annual
assessment from each Member State and impose fees on Licensees of Member
States to whom it grants a Compact Privilege to cover the cost of the
operations and activities of the Compact Commission and its staff, which
must be in a total amount sufficient to cover its annual budget as
approved each year for which revenue is not provided by other sources.
The aggregate annual assessment amount for Member States shall be
allocated based upon a formula that the Compact Commission shall
promulgate by Rule.
4. The Compact Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind
prior to securing the funds or a loan adequate to meet the same; nor
shall the Compact Commission pledge the credit of any of the Member
States, except by and with the authority of the Member State.
5. The Compact Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all
receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Compact
Commission shall be subject to the financial review or audit and
accounting procedures established under its bylaws. However, all receipts
and disbursements of funds handled by the Compact Commission shall be
subject to an annual financial review or audit by a certified or licensed
public accountant, and the report of the financial review or audit shall
be included in and become part of the annual report of the Compact
Commission.
H. Qualified Immunity, Defense, and Indemnification:
1. The members, officers, executive director, employees, and
representatives of the Compact Commission shall be immune from suit and
liability, both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim
for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil
liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error,
or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is
made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
-20-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
Compact Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that
nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person
from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused
by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. The
procurement of insurance of any type by the Compact Commission shall not
in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
2. The Compact Commission shall defend any member, officer,
executive director, employee, and representative of the Compact
Commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of
any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the
scope of Compact Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or
as determined by the Compact Commission that the person against whom the
claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the
scope of Compact Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities;
provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person
from retaining their own counsel at their own expense; and provided
further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not
result from that person's intentional or willful or wanton misconduct.
3. The Compact Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any
member, officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the
Compact Commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained
against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
omission that occurred within the scope of Compact Commission employment,
duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis
for believing occurred within the scope of Compact Commission employment,
duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act,
error, or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or
wanton misconduct of that person.
4. Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the
liability of any Licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct,
which shall be governed solely by any other applicable State laws.
-21-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
5. Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to waive or
otherwise abrogate a Member State's state action immunity or state action
affirmative defense with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman
Act, Clayton Act, or any other State or federal antitrust or
anticompetitive law or regulation.
6. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity by the Member States or by the Compact Commission.
SECTION 9. DATA SYSTEM
A. The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated Data System and reporting
system containing licensure, Compact Privileges, Adverse Action, and the
presence of Current Significant Investigative Information on all
Licensees and applicants for a License in Member States.
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of State law to the contrary,
a Member State shall submit a uniform data set to the Data System on all
Licensees, applicants, and others to whom this compact is applicable as
required by the Rules of the Compact Commission, including:
1. Personally identifying information;
2. Licensure data;
3. Adverse Actions against a Licensee, License applicant, or Compact
Privilege and information related thereto;
4. Non-confidential information related to Alternative Program
participation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and
other information related to such participation;
5. Any denial of an application for licensure, and the reason for
such denial, excluding the reporting of any criminal history record
information where prohibited by law;
6. A binary determination regarding the presence of Current
Significant Investigative Information; and
7. Other information that may facilitate the administration of this
compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the Rules of
-22-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
the Commission.
C. The records and information provided to a Member State pursuant
to this compact or through the Data System, when certified by the
Commission or an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated
business records of the Commission, and shall be entitled to any
associated hearsay exception in any relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or
administrative proceedings in a Member State.
D. Current Significant Investigative Information pertaining to a
Licensee in any Member State will only be available to other Member
States.
E. It is the responsibility of the Member States to monitor the Data
System to determine whether Adverse Action has been taken against a
Licensee or License applicant. Adverse Action information pertaining to a
Licensee or License applicant in any Member State will be available to
any other Member State.
F. Member States contributing information to the Data System may
designate information that may not be shared with the public without the
express permission of the contributing State.
G. Any information submitted to the Data System that is subsequently
expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the Member State
contributing the information shall be removed from the Data System.
SECTION 10. RULEMAKING
A. The Compact Commission shall promulgate reasonable Rules in order
to effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and
provisions of the compact. A Rule shall be invalid and have no force or
effect only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the Rule is
invalid because the Compact Commission exercised its rulemaking authority
in a manner that is beyond the scope and purposes of the compact, or the
powers granted hereunder, or based upon another applicable standard of
review.
B. The Rules of the Compact Commission shall have the force of law
-23-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
in each Member State, provided however that where the Rules conflict with
the laws or regulations of a Member State that relate to the Scope of
Practice a Licensed Athletic Trainer is permitted to undertake in that
State and the circumstances under which they may do so, as held by a
court of competent jurisdiction, the Rules of the Compact Commission
shall be ineffective in that State to the extent of the conflict.
C. The Compact Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers
pursuant to the criteria set forth in this section and the Rules adopted
thereunder. Rules of this compact shall become binding on the day
following adoption or as of the date specified in the Rule or amendment,
whichever is later.
D. If a majority of the legislatures of the Member States rejects a
Rule or portion of a Rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the
same manner used to adopt the compact within four years of the date of
adoption of the Rule, then such Rule shall have no further force and
effect in any Member State.
E. Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the
Compact Commission.
F. Prior to adoption of a proposed Rule, the Compact Commission
shall hold a public hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written
comments, data, facts, opinions, and arguments. At least thirty days in
advance of the public hearing on the proposed Rule, the Compact
Commission shall provide a notice of proposed rulemaking:
1. On the website of the Compact Commission or other publicly
accessible platform;
2. To persons who have requested notice of the Compact Commission's
notices of proposed rulemaking; and
3. In such other ways as the Compact Commission may by Rule specify.
G. The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
1. The time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the
Compact Commission will hear public comments on the proposed Rule and, if
-24-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
different, the time, date, and location of the meeting where the Compact
Commission will consider and vote on the proposed Rule;
2. If the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference,
or other electronic means, the Compact Commission shall include the
mechanism for access to the hearing in the notice of proposed rulemaking;
3. The text of the proposed Rule and the reason therefor;
4. A request for comments on the proposed Rule from any interested
person; and
5. The manner in which interested persons may submit written
comments.
H. All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all
written comments and documents received by the Compact Commission in
response to the proposed Rule shall be available to the public.
I. Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a
separate hearing on each Rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience
of the Compact Commission at hearings required by this section.
J. The Compact Commission shall, by majority vote of all members,
take final action on the proposed Rule based on the rulemaking record and
the full text of the Rule.
1. The Compact Commission may adopt changes to the proposed Rule
provided the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed
Rule.
2. The Compact Commission shall provide an explanation of the
reasons for substantive changes made to the proposed Rule as well as
reasons for substantive changes not made that were recommended by
commenters.
3. The Compact Commission shall determine a reasonable effective
date for the Rule. Except for an emergency as provided in this section,
the effective date of the Rule shall be no sooner than thirty days after
issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the Rule.
K. Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Compact
-25-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
Commission may consider and adopt an emergency Rule with twenty-four
hours' notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the usual
rulemaking procedures provided in the compact and in this section shall
be retroactively applied to the Rule as soon as reasonably possible, in
no event later than ninety days after the effective date of the Rule. For
the purposes of this provision, an emergency Rule is one that must be
adopted immediately in order to:
1. Meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
2. Prevent a loss of Compact Commission or Member State funds;
3. Meet a deadline for the promulgation of a Rule that is
established by federal law or rule; or
4. Protect public health and safety.
L. The Compact Commission or an authorized committee of the Compact
Commission may direct revisions to a previously adopted Rule for purposes
of correcting typographical errors, errors in format, errors in
consistency, or grammatical errors. Public notice of any revisions shall
be posted on the website of the Compact Commission. The revisions shall
be subject to challenge by any person for a period of thirty days after
posting. A revision may be challenged only on grounds that the revision
results in a material change to a Rule. A challenge shall be made in
writing and delivered to the Compact Commission prior to the end of the
notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect
without further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may
not take effect without the approval of the Compact Commission.
M. No Member State's rulemaking requirements shall apply under this
compact.
SECTION 11. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
A. Oversight:
1. The executive and judicial branches of State government in each
Member State shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary
and appropriate to implement the compact.
-26-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
2. Except as otherwise provided in this compact, venue is proper and
judicial proceedings by or against the Compact Commission shall be
brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where
the principal office of the Compact Commission is located. The Compact
Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it
adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution
proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or
propriety of venue in any action against a Licensee for professional
malpractice, misconduct or any such similar matter.
3. The Compact Commission shall be entitled to receive service of
process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of
the compact and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for
all purposes. Failure to provide the Compact Commission service of
process shall render a judgment or order void as to the Compact
Commission, this compact, or promulgated Rules.
B. Default, Technical Assistance, and Termination:
1. If the Compact Commission determines that a Member State has
defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under
this compact or the promulgated Rules, the Commission shall provide
written notice to the defaulting State. The notice of default shall
describe the default, the proposed means of curing the default, and any
other action that the Compact Commission may take, and shall offer
training and specific technical assistance regarding the default.
2. The Compact Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of
default to the other Member States.
C. If a State in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting
State may be terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a
majority of the Commissioners of the Member States, and all rights,
privileges and benefits conferred on that State by this compact may be
terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default
does not relieve the offending State of obligations or liabilities
-27-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
incurred during the period of default.
D. Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only
after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice
of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Compact
Commission to the Governor, the majority and minority leaders of the
defaulting State's legislature, the defaulting State's Licensing
Authority and each of the Member States' Licensing Authority.
E. A State that has been terminated is responsible for all
assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective
date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the
effective date of termination.
F. Upon the termination of a State's membership from this compact,
that State shall immediately provide notice to all Licensees within that
State of such termination. The terminated State shall continue to
recognize all Licenses and Compact Privileges granted pursuant to this
compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty days after the date of said
notice of termination.
G. The Compact Commission shall not bear any costs related to a
State that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the
compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the Compact Commission and
the defaulting State.
H. The defaulting State may appeal the action of the Compact
Commission by petitioning the United States District Court for the
District of Columbia or the federal district where the Compact Commission
has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all
costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
I. Dispute Resolution:
1. Upon request by a Member State, the Compact Commission shall
attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among
Member States and between Member and non-Member States.
2. The Compact Commission shall promulgate a Rule providing for both
-28-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
J. Enforcement:
1. By two-thirds majority vote, the Compact Commission may initiate
legal action against a Member State in default in the United States
District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where
the Compact Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance
with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief
sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event
judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded
all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. The
remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the Compact
Commission. The Compact Commission may pursue any other remedies
available under federal or the defaulting Member State's law.
2. A Member State may initiate legal action against the Compact
Commission in the United States District Court for the District of
Columbia or the federal district where the Compact Commission has its
principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions of the
compact and its promulgated Rules. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is
necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such
litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees.
3. No person other than a Member State shall enforce this compact
against the Compact Commission.
SECTION 12. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
A. The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the
compact statute is enacted into law in the seventh Member State.
1. On or after the effective date of the compact, the Compact
Commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of the first
seven Member States (Charter Member States) to determine if the statute
enacted and made effective by each such Charter Member State is
materially different than the Model Compact Language.
-29-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
a. A Charter Member State whose enactment is found to be materially
different from the Model Compact Language shall be entitled to the
default process set forth in Section 11 of this compact.
b. If any Member State is later found to be in default, or is
terminated or withdraws from the compact, the Compact Commission shall
remain in existence and the compact shall remain in effect even if the
number of Member States should be less than seven.
2. Member States enacting the compact subsequent to the seven
initial Charter Member States shall be subject to the process set forth
in this section to determine if their enactments are materially different
from the Model Compact Language and whether they qualify for
participation in the compact.
3. All actions taken for the benefit of the Compact Commission or in
furtherance of the purposes of the administration of the compact prior to
the effective date of the compact or the Compact Commission coming into
existence shall be considered to be actions of the Compact Commission
unless specifically repudiated by the Compact Commission.
4. Any State that joins the compact subsequent to the Compact
Commission's initial adoption of the Rules and bylaws shall be subject to
the Rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the compact
becomes law in that State. Any Rule that has been previously adopted by
the Compact Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the
day the compact becomes law in that State.
B. Any Member State may withdraw from this compact by enacting a
statute repealing the same.
1. A Member State's withdrawal shall not take effect until one
hundred eighty days after enactment of the repealing statute.
2. Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
withdrawing State's Licensing Authority to comply with the investigative
and Adverse Action reporting requirements of this compact prior to the
effective date of withdrawal.
-30-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
3. Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact, a
State shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all
Licensees and privilege holders within that State. Notwithstanding any
subsequent statutory enactment to the contrary, such withdrawing State
shall continue to recognize all Compact Privileges granted pursuant to
this compact for a minimum of one hundred eighty days after the date of
such notice of withdrawal.
4. Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to
invalidate or prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative
arrangement between a Member State and a non-Member State that does not
conflict with the provisions of this compact.
5. This compact may be amended by the Member States. No amendment to
this compact shall become effective and binding upon any Member State
until it is enacted into the laws of all Member States.
SECTION 13. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
A. This compact and the Compact Commission's rulemaking authority
shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the
implementation and administration of the compact. Provisions of the
compact expressly authorizing or requiring the promulgation of Rules
shall not be construed to limit the Compact Commission's rulemaking
authority solely for those purposes.
B. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any
phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is held by a court
of competent jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any
Member State, a State seeking participation in the compact, or of the
United States, or the applicability thereof to any government, agency,
person, or circumstance is held to be unconstitutional by a court of
competent jurisdiction, the validity of the remainder of this compact and
the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person, or
circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
C. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Compact Commission may deny a
-31-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
State's participation in the compact or terminate a Member State's
participation in the compact if it determines that a constitutional
requirement of a Member State is a material departure from the compact.
Otherwise, if this compact shall be held to be contrary to the
constitution of any Member State, the compact shall remain in full force
and effect as to the remaining Member States and in full force and effect
as to the Member State affected as to all severable matters.
SECTION 14. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS
A. Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any
other law of a Member State that is not inconsistent with the compact.
B. Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a
Member State in conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of
the conflict.
C. All permissible agreements between the Compact Commission and the
Member States are binding in accordance with their terms.
Sec. 2. Section 38-131, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
38-131 (1) An applicant for an initial license to practice as a
registered nurse, a licensed practical nurse, a physical therapist, a
physical therapy assistant, an athletic trainer, a psychologist, an
advanced emergency medical technician, an emergency medical technician,
an audiologist, a speech-language pathologist, a licensed independent
mental health practitioner, an occupational therapist, an occupational
therapy assistant, a dietitian, a certified social worker, a certified
master social worker, a licensed clinical social worker, a paramedic, a
physician, an osteopathic physician, a physician or osteopathic physician
who is an applicant for a temporary educational permit, a physician or
osteopathic physician who is an applicant for a temporary visiting
faculty permit, a physician assistant, a dentist, a dental hygienist, an
optometrist, a podiatrist, a veterinarian, an advanced practice
registered nurse-nurse practitioner, an advanced practice registered
-32-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
nurse-certified nurse midwife, or an advanced practice registered nurse-
certified registered nurse anesthetist shall be subject to a criminal
background check. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,
such an applicant for an initial license shall submit a full set of
fingerprints to the Nebraska State Patrol for a criminal history record
information check. The applicant shall authorize release of the results
of the national criminal history record information check by the Federal
Bureau of Investigation to the department. The applicant shall pay the
actual cost of the fingerprinting and criminal background check.
(2) The Nebraska State Patrol is authorized to submit the
fingerprints of such applicants to the Federal Bureau of Investigation
and to issue a report to the department that includes the criminal
history record information concerning the applicant. The Nebraska State
Patrol shall forward submitted fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for a national criminal history record information check.
The Nebraska State Patrol shall issue a report to the department that
includes the criminal history record information concerning the
applicant.
(3) This section shall not apply to a dentist who is an applicant
for a dental locum tenens under section 38-1122, to a physician or
osteopathic physician who is an applicant for a physician locum tenens
under section 38-2036, or to a veterinarian who is an applicant for a
veterinarian locum tenens under section 38-3335.
(4) A physician or osteopathic physician who is an applicant for a
temporary educational permit shall have ninety days from the issuance of
the permit to comply with subsection (1) of this section and shall have
such permit suspended after such ninety-day period if the criminal
background check is not complete or revoked if the criminal background
check reveals that the applicant was not qualified for the permit.
(5) The department and the Nebraska State Patrol may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations concerning costs associated with the
-33-

LB736 LB736
2026 2026
fingerprinting and the national criminal history record information
check.
(6) For purposes of interpretation by the Federal Bureau of
Investigation, the term department in this section means the Division of
Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services.
Sec. 3. Section 38-404, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-404 Athletic trainer means a health care professional who is
licensed to practice athletic training under the Athletic Training
Practice Act or the Athletic Trainer Compact and who, under guidelines
established with a licensed physician, performs the functions outlined in
section 38-408 except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of section
38-408.
Sec. 4. Section 38-409, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-409 No person shall be authorized to perform the functions
outlined in section 38-408 unless the person first obtains a license as
an athletic trainer or unless such person is licensed as a physician,
osteopathic physician, chiropractor, nurse, physical therapist, or
podiatrist. No person shall hold himself or herself out as an athletic
trainer in this state unless such person is licensed under the Athletic
Training Practice Act or the Athletic Trainer Compact.
Sec. 5. This act becomes operative on January 1, 2027.
Sec. 6. Original sections 38-404 and 38-409, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and section 38-131, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-34-